Connecticut, session 2026, SB00038.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the general statutes be amended to (1) impose a capital gains tax
on any endowment fund of an institution of higher education, which
fund is valued at a ratio of more than five hundred thousand dollars per
student for a taxable year, and (2) dedicate the revenue from such tax to
reducing the amount that participants in the Paid Family and Medical
Leave Insurance Program are required to contribute under section 31-
49g of the general statutes.